Maryland, session 2025, HB0146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
14.5–705.
(a) A trustee may resign [with]:
(1) ON AT LEAST 30 DAYS’ NOTICE TO:
(I) THE QUALIFIED BENEFICIARIES;
(II) THE SETTLOR, IF LIVING;
(III) ALL COTRUSTEES; AND
(IV) ANY PERSON THAT HAS A RIGHT TO REPLACE OR APPOINT A
SUCCESSOR TO THE RESIGNING TRUSTEE; OR
(2) WITH the approval of the court.
(b) In approving a resignation of a trustee, the court may issue orders and impose
conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.
(c) Liability of a resigning trustee or of a surety on the bond of the trustee for acts
or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the resignation of the trustee.
– 1 –

Ch. 228 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –